Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.620

Payment for agricultural commodities purchased—Time requirements.

Every warehouse operator or grain dealer must pay for agricultural commodities purchased by him or her at the time and in the manner specified in the contract with the depositor, but if no time is set by the contract, then within thirty days after taking possession for purpose of sale or taking title of the agricultural product.

[ 2011 c 336 s 642; 1983 c 305 s 62; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 34.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.